Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5711.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, and in order to 
promote the public good, the annual pension amount to be paid by the Worcester regional 
retirement system pursuant to section 100 of chapter 32 of the General Laws to Shannon 
LaPorta, the surviving spouse of Stephen LaPorta, shall be calculated based upon Stephen 
LaPorta holding the rank of sergeant at the time of his death. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect as of January 8, 2026.